dev/shupashkar/apertium-tt-ru.ru.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 
%{И%}:а %{К%}:а %{Ы%}:а  %{Е%}:о %{ЕЕ%}:а %{У%}:о %{УУ%}:а %{О%}:а %{А%}:о 
 %>:0 ;

Sets

Vow = А О Ы У Я Ю Е Э И
      а о ы у я ю е э и ;

Cons = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
       б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь ;

Rules

!"Remove morpheme boundary"
!%>:0 <=> _ ;

"А в И"
%{И%}:и <=> 
